District of Columbia statutes.
2-1104

Study of final report of Joint Committee on Washington Metropolitan Problems.

The Congress further declares that the officers, departments, agencies, and instrumentalities of the executive branch of the federal government and the Mayor of the District of Columbia and the other officers, agencies, and instrumentalities of the District of Columbia, and other agencies of government within the Washington metropolitan region are invited and encouraged to engage in an intensive study of the final report and recommendation of the Joint Committee on Washington Metropolitan Problems with a view to submitting to the Congress the specific recommendations of each of the agencies of government specified.

June 27, 1960, 74 Stat. 223, Pub. L. 86-527, § 5
1981 Ed., § 1-2104.
1973 Ed., § 1-1304.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.